Utah statutes.
67-19e-103.   Administrative law judges -- Standard of conduct.

(1)  All agency administrative law judges who conduct formal administrative hearings are subject to this chapter.

(2)  All administrative law judges are subject to the code of conduct promulgated by the department in accordance with Section 67-19e-104.

(3)  An administrative law judge who tampers with or destroys evidence submitted to the administrative law judge is subject to the provisions of Section 76-8-510.5.  This section does not apply to documents destroyed in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 2, Government Records Access and Management Act.



Enacted by Chapter 165, 2013 General Session

